Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1792, as
amended by Section 699, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1792), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1792. A. Any person who shall willfully trespass or
enter property containing a critical infrastructure facility without
permission by the owner of the property or lawful occupant thereof
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a
fine of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by
imprisonment in the county jail for a term of six (6) months, or by
both such fine and imprisonment. If it is determined the intent of
the trespasser is to willfully damage, destroy, vandalize, deface,
tamper with equipment, or impede or inhibit operations of the
facility, the person shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class D3
felony offense punishable by a fine of not less than Ten Thousand
Dollars ($10,000.00), or by imprisonment as provided for in
subsections B through F of Section 20P of this title, or by both
such fine and imprisonment.
B. Any person who shall willfully damage, destroy, vandalize,
deface or tamper with equipment in a critical infrastructure

facility shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class D3 felony
offense punishable by a fine of One Hundred Thousand Dollars
($100,000.00), or by imprisonment in the custody of the Department
of Corrections for a term of not more than ten (10) years, or by
both such fine and imprisonment.
C. If an organization is found to be a conspirator with persons
who are found to have committed any of the crimes described in
subsection A or B of this section, the conspiring organization shall
be punished by a fine that is ten times the amount of said fine
authorized by the appropriate provision of this section.
D. As used in this section, "critical infrastructure facility"
means:
1. One of the following, if completely enclosed by a fence or
other physical barrier that is obviously designed to exclude
intruders, or if clearly marked with a sign or signs that are posted
on the property that are reasonably likely to come to the attention
of intruders and indicate that entry is forbidden without site
authorization:
a. a petroleum or alumina refinery,
b. an electrical power generating facility, substation,
switching station, electrical control center or
electric power lines and associated equipment
infrastructure,
c. a chemical, polymer or rubber manufacturing facility,
d. a water intake structure, water treatment facility,
wastewater treatment plant or pump station,
e. a natural gas compressor station,
f. a liquid natural gas terminal or storage facility,
g. a telecommunications central switching office,
h. wireless telecommunications infrastructure, including
cell towers, telephone poles and lines, including
fiber optic lines,
ENR. H. B. NO. 4108 Page 2

i. a port, railroad switching yard, railroad tracks,
trucking terminal or other freight transportation
facility,
j. a gas processing plant, including a plant used in the
processing, treatment or fractionation of natural gas
or natural gas liquids,
k. a transmission facility used by a federally licensed
radio or television station,
l. a steelmaking facility that uses an electric arc
furnace to make steel,
m. a facility identified and regulated by the United
States Department of Homeland Security Chemical
Facility Anti-Terrorism Standards (CFATS) program,
n. a dam that is regulated by the state or federal
government,
o. a natural gas distribution utility facility including,
but not limited to, pipeline interconnections, a city
gate or town border station, metering station,
aboveground piping, a regulator station and a natural
gas storage facility, or
p. a crude oil or refined products storage and
distribution facility including, but not limited to,
valve sites, pipeline interconnections, pump station,
metering station, below or aboveground pipeline or
piping and truck loading or offloading facility, or
q. the operational area of an airport including runways,
taxiways, ramps, apron areas, aircraft parking and
storage areas, fuel storage areas, maintenances areas,
and any other area of an airport used or intended to
be used for landing, takeoff, or surface maneuvering
of aircraft; or
2. Any aboveground portion of an oil, gas, hazardous liquid or
chemical pipeline, tank, railroad facility or other storage facility
that is enclosed by a fence, other physical barrier or is clearly
marked with signs prohibiting trespassing, that are obviously
designed to exclude intruders.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4108 Page 3

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4108 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 5th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 4108 Page 5